Hawaii statutes.
§21-10 Conduct of hearings. (a) All
hearings of an investigating committee shall be public unless the committee, by
two-thirds vote of all of its members, determines that a hearing should not be
open to the public in a particular instance.

(b) The chairperson of an investigating
committee, if present and able to act, shall preside at all hearings of the
committee and shall conduct the examination of witnesses alone or supervise
examination by other members of the committee, the committee's counsel, or
members of the committee's staff who are so authorized. In the chairperson's
absence or disability, the vice-chairperson shall serve as presiding officer.
The committee shall provide by its rules for the selection of a presiding
officer to act in the absence or disability of both the chairperson and the
vice-chairperson.

(c) No hearing, or part thereof, shall be
televised, filmed, or broadcast except upon approval of the committee, by
majority vote of all of its members. [L 1969, c 211, pt of §1; gen ch 1985,
1993]

Previous
Vol01_Ch0001-0042F
Next